Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-770
Real estate in two districts; detachment from one district; approval.

When any land is a part of two sanitary and improvement districts and the owners of such land desire that it be a part of only one district, such owners shall file their request with the trustees or the administrator of each district. The trustees or the administrator of the districts shall meet jointly and develop an agreement for the detachment of the land from one of the districts and the adjustment of indebtedness. If the trustees or administrators are unable to reach an agreement, they shall file a petition in the district court of the county in which such land is located and the court shall have jurisdiction to detach the land and adjust the indebtedness.

Laws 1972, LB 1387, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 32.